en: Bedroom furniture items included: Armoire; Bed frame; Bedside table; Bench; Blanket box; Bookcase; Bookcase headboard; Chair; Chest of drawers; Desk; Dresser; Footboard; Headboard; Lamp table; Lingerie chest; Media chest; Mirror; Nightstand; Shelving unit; Storage bed base; Storage ottoman; Tallboy; Under-bed drawers; Vanity table; Wardrobe; Other
fr: Articles mobiliers de salle de bain inclus: Armoire; Cadre de lit; Table de chevet; Banc; Coffre à couvertures; Bibliothèque; Tête de lit bibliothèque; Chaise; Commode; Bureau; Commode; Pied de lit; Tête de lit; Table d’appoint; Chiffonnier; Meuble TV; Miroir; Table de nuit; Meuble étagère; Sommier à coffre; Pouf de rangement; Commode haute; Tiroirs sous le lit; Coiffeuse; Penderie; Autre
th: รายการเฟอร์นิเจอร์ห้องนอนที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ตู้เสื้อผ้าแบบตั้งพื้น; โครงเตียง; โต๊ะข้างเตียง; ม้านั่งยาว; กล่องเก็บผ้าห่ม; ชั้นวางหนังสือ; หัวเตียงแบบชั้นวางหนังสือ; เก้าอี้; ตู้ลิ้นชัก; โต๊ะทำงาน; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง; ปลายเตียง; หัวเตียง; โต๊ะวางโคมไฟ; ตู้เก็บชุดชั้นใน; ตู้เก็บสื่อบันเทิง; กระจก; โต๊ะข้างเตียง; ชุดชั้นวาง; ฐานเตียงเก็บของได้; เก้าอี้สตูลเก็บของได้; ตู้ลิ้นชักทรงสูง; ลิ้นชักใต้เตียง; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง; ตู้เสื้อผ้า; อื่นๆ
nb: Inkluderte soveromsmøbler: Klesskap; Sengeramme; Nattbord; Benk; Teppekasse; Bokhylle; Bokhyllegavl; Stol; Kommode; Skrivebord; Sminkekommode; Fotgavl; Sengegavl; Lampebord; Undertøyskommode; Mediebenk; Speil; Nattbord; Hylle; Sengebunn med oppbevaring; Ottoman med oppbevaring; Høy kommode; Skuffer under sengen; Sminkebord; Garderobeskap; Annet
ko: 침실 가구 품목 포함: 암무아르; 침대 프레임; 침대 협탁; 벤치; 담요 보관함; 책장; 책장형 헤드보드; 의자; 서랍장; 책상; 드레서; 풋보드; 헤드보드; 램프 테이블; 란제리 수납장; 미디어 수납장; 거울; 협탁; 선반 유닛; 수납형 침대 베이스; 수납형 오토만; 톨보이; 침대 하단 서랍; 화장대; 옷장; 기타
fi: Mukana tulevat makuuhuonekalusteet: Vaatekaappi; Sängynrunko; Yöpöytä; Penkki; Peittoarkku; Kirjahylly; Hyllyllinen sängynpääty; Tuoli; Lipasto; Työpöytä; Leveä lipasto; Jalkapääty; Sängynpääty; Lamppupöytä; Alusvaatelipasto; Medialipasto; Peili; Yöpöytä; Hyllykkö; Säilytyssänky; Säilytysrahi; Korkea lipasto; Sängynaluslaatikot; Kampauspöytä; Vaatekaappi; Muu
zh-CN: 包含卧室家具用品: 大衣橱; 床架; 床头柜; 长凳; 毛毯箱; 书架; 书架床头板; 椅子; 抽屉柜; 书桌; 斗柜; 床尾板; 床头板; 台灯桌; 内衣柜; 媒体柜; 镜子; 床头柜; 搁架单元; 收纳床底座; 收纳脚凳; 高斗柜; 床下抽屉; 梳妆台; 衣柜; 其他
sk-SK: Vrátane položiek kúpeľňového nábytku: Šatníková skriňa; Rám postele; Nočný stolík; Lavica; Truhlica na deky; Knižnica; Čelo s knižnicou; Stolička; Komoda; Písací stôl; Bielizník; Čelo pri nohách; Čelo postele; Stolík pod lampu; Komoda na bielizeň; TV komoda; Zrkadlo; Nočný stolík; Regál; Úložný priestor postele; Taburetka s úložným priestorom; Vysoká komoda; Zásuvky pod posteľ; Toaletný stolík; Šatníková skriňa; Iné
da: Møbelartikler til badeværelse medfølger: Garderobeskab; Sengeramme; Sengebord; Bænk; Tæppekiste; Reol; Sengegavl med reol; Stol; Kommode; Skrivebord; Kommode; Fodgavl; Sengegavl; Lampebord; Lingerikommode; Mediemøbel; Spejl; Natbord; Reolenhed; Sengebund med opbevaring; Puf med opbevaring; Høj kommode; Skuffer under sengen; Sminkebord; Garderobeskab; Andet
es: Artículos de muebles de habitación incluidos: Armario; Estructura de cama; Mesa de noche; Banco; Baúl para mantas; Librero; Cabecera con librero; Silla; Cajonera; Escritorio; Cómoda; Pie de cama; Cabecera; Mesa para lámpara; Cajonera para lencería; Cajonera multimedia; Espejo; Mesita de noche; Estantería; Base de cama con almacenamiento; Otomana con almacenamiento; Cajonera alta; Cajones debajo de la cama; Tocador; Ropero; Otro
sv: Sovrumsmöbler som ingår: Klädskåp; Sängram; Sängbord; Bänk; Filtkista; Bokhylla; Huvudgavel med bokhylla; Stol; Hög byrå; Skrivbord; Byrå; Fotgavel; Huvudgavel; Lampbord; Underklädesbyrå; Mediamöbel; Spegel; Nattduksbord; Hylla; Sängbotten med förvaring; Förvaringspuff; Hög byrå; Sänglådor; Sminkbord; Garderob; Övrigt
pt-BR: Iten de móveis de banheiro incluídos: Armário; Estrutura da cama; Mesa de cabeceira; Banco; Baú para cobertores; Estante; Cabeceira com estante; Cadeira; Cômoda com gavetas; Escrivaninha; Cômoda; Peseira; Cabeceira; Mesa de apoio; Cômoda para lingerie; Móvel para TV; Espelho; Mesa de cabeceira; Estante de prateleiras; Base de cama com armazenamento; Puff baú; Cômoda alta; Gavetas sob a cama; Penteadeira; Guarda-roupa; Outros
sl-SI: Priloženi elementi pohištva za spalnico: Omara; Okvir postelje; Nočna omarica; Klop; Skrinja za odeje; Knjižna omara; Vzglavje s knjižno polico; Stol; Predalnik; Pisalna miza; Nizka omara s predali; Posteljno vznožje; Posteljno vzglavje; Mizica za svetilko; Predalnik za perilo; TV-omarica; Ogledalo; Nočna omarica; Regal; Posteljno dno s prostorom za shranjevanje; Tabure s prostorom za shranjevanje; Visoki predalnik; Predali pod posteljo; Toaletna mizica; Garderobna omara; Drugo
pt-PT: Móveis de quarto incluídos: Armário; Estrutura da cama; Mesa de cabeceira; Banco; Baú; Estante; Cabeceira com estante; Cadeira; Cómoda; Secretária; Toucador; Peseira; Cabeceira; Mesa de apoio; Camiseiro; Móvel para conteúdo multimédia; Espelho; Mesa de cabeceira; Estante; Estrado com arrumação; Puff com arrumação; Camiseiro alto; Gavetas sob a cama; Penteadeira; Roupeiro; Outro
pl: Dołączono meble do sypialni: Szafa; Rama łóżka; Stolik nocny; Ławka; Skrzynia na pościel; Regał; Zagłówek z półkami; Krzesło; Komoda z szufladami; Biurko; Komoda; Podnóżek łóżka; Zagłówek; Stolik pod lampę; Bieliźniarka; Komoda RTV; Lustro; Szafka nocna; Regał / Półki; Baza łóżka z pojemnikiem; Puf ze schowkiem; Wysoka komoda (tallboy); Szuflady pod łóżkiem; Toaletka; Szafa; Inne
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys miegamojo baldų elementai: Dekoratyvinė spinta; Lovos rėmas; Naktinis staliukas; Suoliukas; Dėžė patalynei; Knygų spinta; Galvūgalis su knygų lentynomis; Kėdė; Komoda; Rašomasis stalas; Žema komoda; Kojūgalis; Galvūgalis; Staliukas lempai; Komoda apatiniam trikotažui; Komoda aparatūrai; Veidrodis; Naktinis staliukas; Lentyna; Lovos pagrindas su daiktadėže; Pufas su daiktadėže; Aukšta komoda; Stalčiai po lova; Tualetinis staliukas; Drabužių spinta; Kita
de: Schlafzimmermöbel inklusive: Schrank; Bettgestell; Nachttisch; Sitzbank; Wäschetruhe; Bücherregal; Kopfteil mit Regal; Stuhl; Kommode; Schreibtisch; Kommode; Fußteil; Kopfteil; Beistelltisch; Wäschekommode; Medienkommode; Spiegel; Nachttisch; Regaleinheit; Bettbasis mit Stauraum; Sitztruhe; Hochkommode; Unterbettschubladen; Schminktisch; Kleiderschrank; Sonstige
zh-TW: 包含臥室家具品項: 大型衣櫥; 床架; 床頭櫃; 長凳; 毛毯收納箱; 書櫃; 書櫃床頭板; 椅子; 抽屜櫃; 書桌; 梳妝台; 床尾板; 床頭板; 燈桌; 內衣收納櫃; 視聽櫃; 鏡子; 床頭櫃; 層架組; 收納床架; 收納椅凳; 高斗櫃; 床底抽屜; 梳妝台; 衣櫥; 其他
ja: ベッドルーム家具付き: アルモア; ベッドフレーム; ベッドサイドテーブル; ベンチ; ブランケットボックス; 本棚; 本棚付きヘッドボード; チェア; チェスト (引き出し); デスク; ドレッサー; フットボード; ヘッドボード; ランプテーブル; ランジェリーチェスト; メディアチェスト; ミラー; ナイトスタンド; シェルフユニット; 収納付きベッドベース; 収納付きオットマン; トールボーイ; ベッド下引き出し; バニティテーブル; ワードローブ; その他
bg-BG: Включени елементи за мебели за баня: Армоар; Рамка за легло; Нощно шкафче; Пейка; Ракла за одеяла; Етажерка за книги; Табла с етажерка; Стол; Шкаф с чекмеджета; Бюро; Скрин; Долна табла; Табла за легло; Масичка за лампа; Скрин за бельо; Тв шкаф; Огледало; Нощно шкафче; Етажерка; Основа за легло с ракла; Табуретка с ракла; Висок скрин; Чекмеджета под леглото; Тоалетка; Гардероб; Друго
tr: Banyo mobilyaları dahil: Büyük gardırop; Karyola; Komodin; Bank; Battaniye kutusu; Kitaplık; Kitaplıklı yatak başlığı; Sandalye; Şifonyer; Çalışma masası; Aynalı şifonyer; Yatak ayakucu; Yatak başlığı; Lamba masası; İç çamaşırı dolabı; Medya dolabı; Ayna; Komodin; Raf ünitesi; Bazalı karyola; Sandıklı puf; Yüksek şifonyer; Yatak altı çekmeceleri; Makyaj masası; Gardırop; Diğer
ru: Состав мебели для спальни: Шкаф; Каркас кровати; Прикроватный столик; Банкетка; Ящик для белья; Книжный шкаф; Изголовье с полками; Стул; Комод; Письменный стол; Комод; Изножье; Изголовье; Столик для лампы; Комод для белья; Тумба под ТВ; Зеркало; Прикроватная тумбочка; Стеллаж; Основание с местом для хранения; Пуф с ящиком для хранения; Высокий комод; Подкроватные ящики; Туалетный столик; Платяной шкаф; Другое
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi namještaja za spavaću sobu: Ormar; Okvir kreveta; Noćni ormarić; Klupa; Škrinja za deke; Polica za knjige; Uzglavlje s policama za knjige; Stolica; Ladičar; Radni stol; Komoda; Podnožje kreveta; Uzglavlje; Stolić za svjetiljku; Komoda za rublje; TV komoda; Ogledalo; Noćni ormarić; Jedinica s policama; Baza kreveta sa spremištem; Tabure sa spremištem; Visoka komoda; Ladice ispod kreveta; Toaletni stolić; Ormar za odjeću; Ostalo
nl: Inbegrepen slaapkamermeubelstukken: Linnenkast; Bedframe; Nachtkastje; Bankje; Dekenkooi; Boekenkast; Boekenkast-hoofdbord; Stoel; Ladekast; Bureau; Dressoir; Voetbord; Hoofdbord; Lamptafel; Lingeriekastje; Mediakast; Spiegel; Nachtkastje; Vakkenkast; Bedbodem met opbergruimte; Poef met opbergruimte; Hoge ladekast; Bedlades; Kaptafel; Kledingkast; Overige
ro-RO: Articole de mobilier pentru dormitor incluse: Dulap; Cadru de pat; Noptieră; Bancă; Ladă pentru pături; Bibliotecă; Tăblie cu bibliotecă; Scaun; Comodă cu sertare; Birou; Comodă; Tăblie de la picioare; Tăblie; Masă pentru lampă; Comodă pentru lenjerie; Comodă media; Oglindă; Noptieră; Unitate cu rafturi; Bază de pat cu depozitare; Taburet cu depozitare; Comodă înaltă; Sertare sub pat; Masă de toaletă; Dulap; Altele
it: Articoli di arredamento per camera da letto inclusi: Armadio; Struttura letto; Comodino; Panca; Cassapanca; Libreria; Testiera a libreria; Sedia; Cassettiera; Scrivania; Comò; Pediera; Testiera; Tavolino porta lampada; Settimino; Mobile TV; Specchio; Comodino; Scaffale; Letto contenitore; Pouf contenitore; Cassettiera alta; Cassetti sottoletto; Toeletta; Armadio guardaroba; Altro
vi: Các món đồ nội thất phòng ngủ đi kèm: Tủ áo đứng (Armoire); Khung giường; Tủ đầu giường; Ghế dài; Hộp đựng chăn; Tủ sách; Đầu giường có kệ sách; Ghế; Tủ ngăn kéo; Bàn làm việc; Tủ trang điểm; Đuôi giường; Đầu giường; Bàn để đèn; Tủ đựng đồ lót; Tủ để TV; Gương; Tủ đầu giường; Hệ thống kệ; Khung giường có ngăn chứa; Ghế đôn Ottoman có ngăn chứa; Tủ ngăn kéo cao (Tallboy); Ngăn kéo dưới gầm giường; Bàn trang điểm; Tủ quần áo; Khác
el: Περιλαμβάνονται έπιπλα μπάνιου: Ντουλάπα armoire; Σκελετός κρεβατιού; Κομοδίνο; Πάγκος; Μπαούλο υπνοδωματίου; Βιβλιοθήκη; Κεφαλάρι βιβλιοθήκη; Καρέκλα; Συρταριέρα; Γραφείο; Μπουντουάρ/συρταριέρα; Υποπόδιο κρεβατιού; Κεφαλάρι; Τραπέζι για λάμπα; Ψηλή συρταριέρα (lingerie chest); Έπιπλο τηλεόρασης (media chest); Καθρέπτης; Κομοδίνο; Μονάδα ραφιών; Βάση κρεβατιού με αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Υποπόδιο με αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Ψηλή συρταριέρα (tallboy); Συρτάρια κάτω από το κρεβάτι; Μπουντουάρ; Ντουλάπα; Άλλο
cs: Obsažené kusy ložnicového nábytku: Skříň; Rám postele; Noční stolek; Lavice; Truhla na lůžkoviny; Knihovna; Čelo s knihovnou; Židle; Komoda; Psací stůl; Široká komoda; Pelest; Čelo postele; Stolek pod lampu; Komoda na spodní prádlo; Komoda na elektroniku; Zrcadlo; Noční stolek; Policový díl; Postelový rošt s úložným prostorem; Úložný taburet; Vysoká komoda; Zásuvky pod postel; Toaletní stolek; Šatní skříň; Jiné
hu: A mellékelt fürdőszobai bútordarabok: Szekrény; Ágykeret; Éjjeliszekrény; Pad; Ágyneműtartó láda; Könyvespolc; Könyvespolcos fejtámla; Szék; Fiókos szekrény; Íróasztal; Komód; Lábvég; Fejtámla; Lámpaasztal; Fehérneműs szekrény; Médiaszekrény; Tükör; Éjjeliszekrény; Polcos elem; Ágyneműtartós ágykeret; Tárolós puff; Magas fiókos szekrény; Ágy alatti fiókok; Fésülködőasztal; Ruhásszekrény; Egyéb